Hawaii, session 2025, SB981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The research and economic analysis division of the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall conduct a study on the impacts of the minimum wage increases implemented pursuant to Act 114, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022.  As part of the study, the division shall examine and analyze: (1)  The number of businesses or other employers in the State that: (A)  Are subject to section 387-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and have been impacted by the minimum wage increases implemented pursuant to Act 114, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022; and (B)  The number of businesses or other employers that closed or shut down due to increased labor costs, including an analysis of other factors that contributed to business closures; and (2)  Comparative research of other states that have set a higher minimum wage rate than Hawaii, including impacts on businesses and other employers in those states. (b) The division shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________